Washington statutes.
RCW 18.76.090

Use of gifts and grants.

The center may receive gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources that may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the center and spend gifts, grants, or endowments or any income from the public or private sources according to their terms.

[ 1993 c 343 s 5.]